Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [116L.36] GRANTS PROHIBITED TO NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS WITH HIGHLY COMPENSATED OFFICERS OR EMPLOYEES. new text end new text begin (a) A nonprofit organization that compensates an officer or employee in an amount greater than 125 percent of the governor's salary in a 12-month period is not eligible to receive a grant under any economic development or workforce development program administered or overseen by the commissioner in the first fiscal year beginning, during, or after that 12-month period or in the following fiscal year. new text end new text begin (b) The salary limit in paragraph (a) must be adjusted annually on January 1. The new limit must equal the limit for the prior year increased by any increase to the governor's salary and the percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers from October of the second prior year to October of the immediately prior year. new text end new text begin (c) Compensation for purposes of this section includes salary, bonuses, the present value of stock options, the value of employee benefits, employer contributions to retirement or deferred compensation plans on behalf of the officer or employee, and any other compensation or benefit of value. new text end new text begin (d) This section does not apply to performance grants administered under section 116J.8747. new text end